District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.10b

Employer records.

(a)

Employers shall retain records documenting hours worked by employees and paid leave taken by employees for a period of 3 years, and shall allow the Mayor and the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor access to the records, with appropriate notice and at a mutually agreeable time, to monitor compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(b)

When an issue arises as to an employee’s entitlement to paid leave under this chapter, if the employer does not maintain or retain adequate records documenting hours worked by the employee and paid leave taken by the employee, or does not allow the Mayor or the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor reasonable access to the records, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the employer has violated this chapter.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 11b
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-89, § 2(f), 61 DCR 317
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-89 added this section.
For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-57, Jan. 30, 2016, 62 DCR 15602).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-89, § 3, see § 7003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-293, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1215).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-89: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-89 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7003, effective Feb. 26, 2015.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.